Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Sewage Disposal.
§ 32.1-164.
Powers and duties of Board; regulations; fees; onsite soil evaluators; letters in lieu of permits; inspections; civil penalties.

The Board shall have supervision and control over the safe and sanitary collection, conveyance, transportation, treatment, and disposal of sewage by onsite sewage systems and alternative discharging sewage systems, and treatment works as they affect the public health and welfare. The Board shall also have supervision and control over the maintenance, inspection, and reuse of alternative onsite sewage systems as they affect the public health and welfare. In discharging the responsibility to supervise and control the safe and sanitary treatment and disposal of sewage as they affect the public health and welfare, the Board shall exercise due diligence to protect the quality of both surface water and ground water. Upon the final adoption of a general Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination permit by the State Water Control Board, the Board of Health shall assume the responsibility for permitting alternative discharging sewage systems as defined in §

32.1-163

. All such permits shall comply with the applicable regulations of the State Water Control Board and be registered with the State Water Control Board.

In the exercise of its duty to supervise and control the treatment and disposal of sewage, the Board shall require and the Department shall conduct regular inspections of alternative discharging sewage systems. The Board shall also establish requirements for maintenance contracts for alternative discharging sewage systems. The Board may require, as a condition for issuing a permit to operate an alternative discharging sewage system, that the applicant present an executed maintenance contract. Such contract shall be maintained for the life of any general Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit issued by the State Water Control Board.

The regulations of the Board shall govern the collection, conveyance, transportation, treatment and disposal of sewage by onsite sewage systems and alternative discharging sewage systems and the maintenance, inspection, and reuse of alternative onsite sewage systems. Such regulations shall be designed to protect the public health and promote the public welfare and may include, without limitation:

A requirement that the owner obtain a permit from the Commissioner prior to the construction, installation, modification or operation of a sewerage system or treatment works except in those instances where a permit is required pursuant to Chapter 3.1 (§

62.1-44.2

et seq.) of Title 62.1.

Criteria for the granting or denial of such permits.

Standards for the design, construction, installation, modification and operation of sewerage systems and treatment works for permits issued by the Commissioner.

Standards governing disposal of sewage on or in soils.

Standards specifying the minimum distance between sewerage systems or treatment works and:

Public and private wells supplying water for human consumption,

Lakes and other impounded waters,

Streams and rivers,

Shellfish waters,

Ground waters,

Areas and places of human habitation,

Property lines.

Standards as to the adequacy of an approved water supply.

Standards governing the transportation of sewage.

A prohibition against the discharge of untreated sewage onto land or into waters of the Commonwealth.

A requirement that such residences, buildings, structures and other places designed for human occupancy as the Board may prescribe be provided with a sewerage system or treatment works.

Criteria for determining the demonstrated ability of alternative onsite systems, which are not permitted through the then current sewage handling and disposal regulations, to treat and dispose of sewage as effectively as approved methods.

Standards for inspections of and requirements for maintenance contracts for alternative discharging sewage systems.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 1 above and Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1, a requirement that the owner obtain a permit from the Commissioner prior to the construction, installation, modification, or operation of an alternative discharging sewage system as defined in §

32.1-163

.

Criteria for granting, denying, and revoking of permits for alternative discharging sewage systems.

Procedures for issuing letters recognizing onsite sewage sites in lieu of issuing onsite sewage system permits.

Performance requirements for nitrogen discharged from alternative onsite sewage systems that protect public health and ground and surface water quality.

Consideration of the impacts of climate change on proposed treatment works based on research and analysis from the Center for Coastal Resources Management at the Virginia Institute of Marine Science at The College of William and Mary in Virginia.

A fee of $75 shall be charged for filing an application for an onsite sewage system or an alternative discharging sewage system permit with the Department. Funds received in payment of such charges shall be transmitted to the Comptroller for deposit. The funds from the fees shall be credited to a special fund to be appropriated by the General Assembly, as it deems necessary, to the Department for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this title. However, $10 of each fee shall be credited to the Onsite Sewage Indemnification Fund established pursuant to §

32.1-164.1:01

.

The Board, in its regulations, shall establish a procedure for the waiver of fees for persons whose incomes are below the federal poverty guidelines established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services or when the application is for a pit privy or the repair of a failing onsite sewage system. If the Department denies the permit for land on which the applicant seeks to construct his principal place of residence, then such fee shall be refunded to the applicant.

From such funds as are appropriated to the Department from the special fund, the Board shall apportion a share to local or district health departments to be allocated in the same ratios as provided for the operation of such health departments pursuant to §

32.1-31

. Such funds shall be transmitted to the local or district health departments on a quarterly basis.

In addition to factors related to the Board’s responsibilities for the safe and sanitary treatment and disposal of sewage as they affect the public health and welfare, the Board shall, in establishing standards, give due consideration to economic costs of such standards in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

Further a fee of $75 shall be charged for such installation and monitoring inspections of alternative discharging sewage systems as may be required by the Board. The funds received in payment of such fees shall be credited to a special fund to be appropriated by the General Assembly, as it deems necessary, to the Department for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section. However, $10 of each fee shall be credited to the Onsite Sewage Indemnification Fund established pursuant to §

32.1-164.1:01

.

The Board, in its regulations, shall establish a procedure for the waiver of fees for persons whose incomes are below the federal poverty guidelines established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

Any owner who violates any provision of this section or any regulation of the Board of Health or the State Water Control Board relating to alternative discharging sewage systems or who fails to comply with any order of the Board of Health or any special final order of the State Water Control Board shall be subject to the penalties provided in §§

32.1-27

and

62.1-44.32

.

In the event that a county, city, or town, or its agent, is the owner, the county, city, or town, or its agent may initiate a civil action against any user or users of an alternative discharging sewage system to recover that portion of any civil penalty imposed against the owner which directly resulted from violations by the user or users of any applicable federal, state, or local laws, regulations, or ordinances.

The Board shall establish and implement procedures for issuance of letters recognizing the appropriateness of onsite sewage site conditions in lieu of issuing onsite sewage system permits. The Board may require that a survey plat be included with an application for such letter. Such letters shall state, in language determined by the Office of the Attorney General and approved by the Board, the appropriateness of the soil for an onsite sewage system; no system design shall be required for issuance of such letter. The letter may be recorded in the land records of the clerk of the circuit court in the jurisdiction where all or part of the site or proposed site of the onsite sewage system is to be located so as to be a binding notice to the public, including subsequent purchases of the land in question. Upon the sale or transfer of the land which is the subject of any letter, the letter shall be transferred with the title to the property. A permit shall be issued on the basis of such letter unless, from the date of the letter’s issuance, there has been a substantial, intervening change in the soil or site conditions where the onsite sewage system is to be located. The Board, Commissioner, and the Department shall accept evaluations from licensed onsite soil evaluators for the issuance of such letters, if they are produced in accordance with the Board’s established procedures for issuance of letters. The Department shall issue such letters within 20 working days of the application filing date when evaluations produced by licensed onsite soil evaluators are submitted as supporting documentation. The Department shall not be required to do a field check of the evaluation prior to issuing such a letter or a permit based on such letter; however, the Department may conduct such field analyses as deemed necessary to protect the integrity of the Commonwealth’s environment. Applicants for such letters in lieu of onsite sewage system permits shall pay the fee established by the Board for the letters’ issuance and, upon application for an onsite sewage system permit, shall pay the permit application fee.

The Board shall establish a program for the operation and maintenance of alternative onsite systems. The program shall require:

The owner of an alternative onsite sewage system, as defined in §

32.1-163

, to have that system operated by a licensed operator, as defined in §

32.1-163

, and visited by the operator as specified in the operation permit;

The licensed operator to provide a report on the results of the site visit utilizing the web-based system required by this subsection. A fee of $1 shall be paid by the licensed operator at the time the report is filed. Such fees shall be credited to the Onsite Operation and Maintenance Fund established pursuant to §

32.1-164.8

;

A statewide web-based reporting system to track the operation, monitoring, and maintenance requirements of each system, including its components. The system shall have the capability for pre-notification of operation, maintenance, or monitoring to the operator or owner. Licensed operators shall be required to enter their reports onto the system. The Department of Health shall utilize the system to provide for compliance monitoring of operation and maintenance requirements throughout the state. The Commissioner shall consider readily available commercial systems currently utilized within the Commonwealth; and

Any additional requirements deemed necessary by the Board.

The Board shall promulgate regulations governing the requirements for maintaining alternative onsite sewage systems.

The Board shall establish a uniform schedule of civil penalties for violations of (i) regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection B and (ii) onsite treatment system pump-out requirements promulgated pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) in localities in which compliance with such onsite treatment system pump-out requirements is managed and enforced by the Department that are not remedied within 30 days after service of notice from the Department. Civil penalties collected pursuant to this chapter shall be credited to the Environmental Health Education and Training Fund established pursuant to §

32.1-248.3

.

This schedule of civil penalties shall be uniform for each type of specified violation, and the penalty for any one violation shall be not more than $100 for the initial violation and not more than $150 for each additional violation. Each day during which the violation is found to have existed shall constitute a separate offense. However, specified violations arising from the same operative set of facts shall not be charged more than once in any 10-day period, and a series of specified violations arising from the same operative set of facts shall not result in civil penalties exceeding a total of $3,000. Penalties shall not apply to unoccupied structures which do not contribute to the pollution of public or private water supplies or the contraction or spread of infectious, contagious, or dangerous diseases. The Department may pursue other remedies as provided by law; however, designation of a particular violation for a civil penalty pursuant to this section shall be in lieu of criminal penalties, except for any violation that contributes to or is likely to contribute to the pollution of public or private water supplies or the contraction or spread of infectious, contagious, or dangerous diseases.

The Department may issue a civil summons ticket as provided by law for a scheduled violation. Any person summoned or issued a ticket for a scheduled violation may make an appearance in person or in writing by mail to the Department prior to the date fixed for trial in court. Any person so appearing may enter a waiver of trial, admit liability, and pay the civil penalty established for the offense charged.

If a person charged with a scheduled violation does not elect to enter a waiver of trial and admit liability, the violation shall be tried in the general district court with jurisdiction in the same manner and with the same right of appeal as provided for by law. In any trial for a scheduled violation, the Department shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence the liability of the alleged violator. An admission of liability or finding of liability under this section shall not be deemed an admission at a criminal proceeding.

This section shall not be interpreted to allow the imposition of civil penalties for activities related to land development.

The Department shall establish procedures for requiring a survey plat as part of an application for a permit or letter for any onsite sewage or alternative discharging sewage system, and for granting waivers for such requirements. In all cases, it shall be the landowner’s responsibility to ensure that the system is properly located as permitted.

Effective July 1, 2023, requirements promulgated under the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) directly related to compliance with onsite sewage treatment system pump-outs shall be managed and enforced by the Department in Accomack, Essex, Gloucester, King and Queen, King William, Lancaster, Mathews, Middlesex, Northampton, Northumberland, Richmond, and Westmoreland Counties, and the incorporated towns within those counties. Licensed operators conducting onsite sewage treatment system pump-outs pursuant to requirements promulgated under the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) in localities managed and enforced by the Department shall provide a report on the results of the site visit using a web-based reporting system developed by the Department. Any person who violates the onsite treatment system pump-out requirements promulgated pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§ 62.1-44.15:67 et seq.) in a locality in which compliance with such onsite treatment system pump-out requirements is managed and enforced by the Department is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-9; 1954, c. 646; 1964, c. 436; 1970, c. 645; 1972, c. 775; 1979, c. 711; 1986, c. 401; 1988, c. 203; 1990, cc. 438, 861, 869; 1994, c. 747; 1999, c. 871; 2003, c. 614; 2007, cc. 514, 892, 924; 2009, cc. 695, 747; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 382; 2022, c. 486.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 220 and 296, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board shall, within 280 days, adopt regulations establishing performance requirements and horizontal setbacks necessary to protect public health and the environment for alternative systems permitted pursuant to the Board’s regulations implementing this chapter. Such regulations shall include a requirement for a comment period of at least 30 days, pursuant to §

2.2-4007.01

, and shall contain operation and maintenance requirements consistent with the requirements for alternative onsite sewage systems contained in §

32.1-164

.”

Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, Item 292 A, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020, provides: “1. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $425.00, for a construction permit for on-site sewage systems designed for less than 1,000 gallons per day, and alternative discharging systems not supported with certified work from an onsite soil evaluator or a professional engineer working in consultation with an onsite soil evaluator.

“2. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $350.00, for the certification letter for less than 1,000 gallons per day not supported with certified work from an onsite soil evaluator or a professional engineer working in consultation with an onsite soil evaluator.

“3. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $225.00, for a construction permit for an onsite sewage system designed for less than 1,000 gallons per day when the application is supported with certified work from a licensed onsite soil evaluator.

“4. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $320.00, for the certification letter for less than 1,000 gallons per day supported with certified work from an onsite soil evaluator or a professional engineer working in consultation with an onsite soil evaluator.

“5. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $300.00, for a construction permit for a private well.

“6. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $1,400.00, for a construction permit or certification letter designed for more than 1,000 gallons per day.

“7. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, and starting July 1, 2019, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of $425.00, for a permit to repair an onsite sewage system or an alternative discharging system designed for less than 1,000 gallons per day not supported with certified work from an onsite soil evaluator or a professional engineer working in consultation with an onsite soil evaluator. This fee shall be waived for persons with income below 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines as established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services when the application is for a pit privy or for a repair of a failing onsite or alternative discharging sewage system.

“8. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, and starting July 1, 2019, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of $225.00, for a permit to repair or voluntarily upgrade an onsite sewage system or alternative discharging system designed for less than 1,000 gallons per day supported with certified work from an onsite soil evaluator or a professional engineer. This fee shall be waived for persons with income below 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines as established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services when the application is for a pit privy or for a repair of a failing onsite or alternative discharging sewage system.

“9. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, and starting July 1, 2019, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of $150.00, to provide written authorizations pursuant to §

32.1-165

not supported with certified work from a qualified professional.

“10. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, and starting July 1, 2019, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of $100.00, to provide written authorizations pursuant to §

32.1-165

supported with certified work from a qualified professional.

“11. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, and starting July 1, 2019, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of $1,400.00, for a permit to repair or voluntarily upgrade an onsite sewage system designed for more than 1,000 gallons per day.

“12. The State Health Commissioner shall appoint two manufacturers to the Advisory Committee on Sewage Handling and Disposal, representing one system installer and the Association of Onsite Soil Engineers.”

Acts 2019, c. 429, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Health shall develop a plan for the oversight and enforcement by the Department of requirements related to the inspection and pump-out of onsite sewage treatment systems that do not require a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit established pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and are located in counties eligible for participation in the Rural Coastal Virginia Community Enhancement Authority pursuant to Chapter 76 (§

15.2-7600

et seq.) of Title 15.2 of the Code of Virginia. The Department shall present such plan to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health prior to implementing the plan.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 382, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Health (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of §

32.1-164

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act. If requested by the Board, technical assistance during the regulatory development process shall be provided by the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the Department of Environmental Quality.”

Acts 2022, c. 486, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health (the Department) shall provide outreach and education to homeowners to ensure compliance with onsite sewage treatment system pump-out requirements adopted pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq. of the Code of Virginia). The Department shall provide to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health an interim report by December 1, 2024, and a final report by December 1, 2025, on compliance with such onsite sewage treatment system pump-out requirements in the localities specified in subsection L of §

32.1-164

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and subsection H of §

62.1-44.15:72

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and the incorporated towns within such localities. Such reports shall also include recommendations to improve compliance with onsite sewage treatment system pump-out requirements adopted pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 614 in the first paragraph of subsection A, substituted “by onsite sewage systems and alternative discharging sewage systems” for “all sewerage systems” in the first sentence, and deleted “The regulation of sewage, as it may affect the public health, shall be primarily the responsibility of the Board and, in cases to which the provisions of Chapter 3.1 (§

62.1-44.2

et seq.) of Title 62.1 are applicable, the joint responsibility of the Board and the State Water Control Board in accordance with such chapter. However” preceding the present next-to-last sentence; inserted “sewage by onsite sewage systems and alternative discharging sewage systems” in the introductory language of subsection B; added “for permits issued by the Commissioner” at the end of subdivision B 3; substituted “$10” for “ten dollars” in subsections C and E; and substituted “20” for “twenty” in subsection H.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 514 added subsection I [now J].

The 2007 amendment by c. 892, effective July 1, 2009, deleted former subdivisions B 15, B 16, pertaining to critera for approved training courses and listing of qualified persons, respectively; deleted former subsection G, pertaining to a program for qualifying onsite soil evaluators; redesignated former subsection H as present subsection G; in subsection G, deleted “traditional septic or other” in the first sentence, deleted “septic or other” preceding “onsite sewage system” in the second and fourth sentences, substituted “licensed” for “authorized” in the fifth and sixth sentences, and substituted “for an onsite sewage system” for “for a septic system permit or other onsite sewage system” near the end of the last sentence; and added present subsection H.

The 2007 amendment by c. 924, effective July 1, 2009, inserted the present second sentence in subsection A; inserted “and the maintenance, inspection, and reuse of alternative onsite sewage systems” to the end of the first sentence in subsection B; deleted former subdivisions B 15, B 16, pertaining to critera for approved training courses and listing of qualified persons, respectively; deleted former subsection G, pertaining to a program for qualifying onsite soil evaluators; redesignated former subsection H as present subsection G; in subsection G, deleted “traditional septic or other” in the first sentence, deleted “septic or other” preceding “onsite sewage system” in the second and fourth sentences, substituted “licensed” for “authorized” in the fifth and sixth sentences, and substituted “for an onsite sewage system” for “for a septic system permit or other onsite sewage system” near the end of the last sentence; and added present subsection H (now I).

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 695 added subdivision B 15.

The 2009 amendment by c. 747 inserted the second sentence in subsection G; and added subsection K.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 382, effective July 1, 2021, added subdivision B 16; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 486 in subsection J, inserted the clause (i) designation and “and (ii) onsite treatment system pump-out requirements promulgated pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) in localities in which compliance with such onsite treatment system pump-out requirements is managed and enforced by the Department” in the first paragraph; and added subsection L.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-405 Real Estate Sales Contract for Unimproved Property; No. 16-421 Contract Clause as to Soil Study Contingency.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Survey plat required with application for well construction permit. —

The Department of Health has the authority to require submission of a survey plat with an application for a private well construction permit. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Lynwood W. Lewis, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 08-048, 2008 Va. AG LEXIS 24 (7/28/08).

Standards and requirements for alternative onsite sewage systems. —

Virginia locality can adopt standards and requirements for alternative onsite sewage systems that are in addition to or more stringent than those promulgated in regulations by the Board of Health, provided such standards or regulations do not relate to maintenance issues. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable L. Scott Lingamfelter, Member, House of Delegates, 11-100, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 10 (3/9/12).

A Virginia locality cannot adopt requirements and standards for alternative onsite sewage systems that are in addition to or more stringent than those enacted by the Board of Health and administered through the Virginia Department of Health when the conditions set forth in subsection C of §

15.2-2157

exist, namely that (i) there is no sewer or sewerage disposal facility available and (ii) the alternative onsite sewage system has been approved by the Virginia Department of Health for use in the particular circumstances and conditions in which the proposed system is to be operating. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Stephen H. Martin, Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-045, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (11/9/2012).

§ 32.1-164.1.
Appeals from denials of septic tank permits; inspections.

Whenever administrative action is taken to deny a septic tank permit or to grant a septic tank permit with conditions or to refuse to issue, or grant with conditions, a letter recognizing the appropriateness of onsite sewage site conditions in lieu of issuing an onsite sewage system permit, the applicant shall be advised in writing of the administrative remedies that are available to obtain a reversal of the denial or refusal or a modification or elimination of the conditions, or, if no further administrative remedies are available, of the right of appeal provided for hereinafter. After exhausting his administrative remedies, as set forth in §

32.1-164.1:1

et seq., any person aggrieved by a case decision of the Review Board shall have the right to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).The decision may be recorded in the land records of the clerk of the circuit court in the jurisdiction where all or part of the site or proposed site of the septic system is located so as to be binding notice to the public, including subsequent purchases of the land in question.

The holder of any permit for a septic tank issued with conditions shall have the permit recorded in the land records of the clerk of the circuit court having jurisdiction over the site of the septic system. The holder of the permit and any subsequent holders of the permit through land purchase or transfer shall be bound by the conditions stated in the permit unless the holder or subsequent holder obtains an additional permit for modification or alteration of the septic system to meet any new use conditions.

In adopting regulations prescribing criteria for the granting or denial of permits for septic tanks, the Board shall consider varying circumstances such as population density, extent of use of the septic tank and such other circumstances as may affect the stringency of the criteria necessary to protect the public health and promote the general welfare and may provide for the issuance of permits for septic tanks subject to such conditions as may be necessary to protect the public health.

Upon receipt of an application for a septic tank permit or a letter recognizing the appropriateness of onsite sewage site conditions in lieu of issuing onsite sewage system permits, the local health department shall notify the governing body of the county or city where the septic tank will be located or the official designated by the governing body for that purpose and shall provide such information concerning the application and the actions taken on the application as the governing body or officer may request.

Whenever a construction permit has been issued pursuant to an evaluation and design certified by a licensed professional engineer or onsite soil evaluator, the certifying licensed professional engineer or onsite soil evaluator shall inspect that system at the time of installation and provide an inspection report to the Department. The Department may, but is not required to, inspect the installation of such onsite sewage system. In the event that the certifying licensed professional engineer or onsite soil evaluator does not inspect the system in a timely manner or declines to certify that the installation was completed substantially in accordance with the evaluation and design, the owner may petition the Department to inspect the installation and render a final case decision approving or disapproving the installation. The Department shall not be required to convene an informal fact finding proceeding in accordance with §

2.2-4019

prior to rendering such decision.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-9.01; 1979, c. 497; 1980, c. 503; 1984, cc. 457, 548; 1986, c. 615; 1994, c. 747; 2012, c. 184.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1979 act having been 32-9.01.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 184 substituted “that purpose” for “the purpose” in subsection D and added subsection E.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 5.